Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.130

Additional names.

If for any reason the jurors drawn for service upon a jury for any term shall not be sufficient to dispose of the pending jury business, or where no jury is in regular attendance and the business of the court may require the attendance of a jury before a regular term, the judge or judges of any court may direct the random selection and summoning from the master jury list such additional names as they may consider necessary.

[ 1988 c 188 s 12; 1911 c 57 s 6; RRS s 99.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.